Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3506
Conversion of passive radon mitigation system to active radon mitigation system authorized.

A building contractor or a subcontractor of a building contractor may convert a passive radon mitigation system to an active radon mitigation system in accordance with rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department under the Radiation Control Act for radon mitigation, but the contractor or subcontractor is not required to be a radon mitigation specialist to convert such system. A radon mitigation specialist shall conduct any postinstallation testing of such system.

Laws 2019, LB130, § 9.

Radiation Control Act, see section 71-3519.